Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.370

Merger of partnerships.

(1) One or more domestic partnerships may merge with one or more domestic partnerships, domestic limited partnerships, domestic limited liability companies, or domestic corporations pursuant to a plan of merger approved or adopted as provided in RCW 25.05.375.

(2) The plan of merger must set forth:

(a) The name of each partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, and corporation planning to merge and the name of the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation into which the other partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation plans to merge;

(b) The terms and conditions of the merger; and

(c) The manner and basis of converting the interests of each member of each limited liability company, the partnership interests in each partnership and each limited partnership, and the shares of each corporation party to the merger into the interests, shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving or any other partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation or into cash or other property in whole or part.

(3) The plan of merger may set forth:

(a) Amendments to the certificate of formation of the surviving limited liability company;

(b) Amendments to the certificate of limited partnership of the surviving limited partnership;

(c) Amendments to the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation; and

(d) Other provisions relating to the merger.

(4) If the plan of merger does not specify a delayed effective date, it shall become effective upon the filing of articles of merger as provided in RCW 23.95.210. A plan of merger may specify a delayed effective time and date in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5106; 1998 c 103 s 905.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.